uz_UZ.aff
SFX X 0 yapsanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsanlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsanlardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsanlarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapsizlarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapti [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapti-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapti-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapti-yu [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yapti-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 yaptilarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapman [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapman-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapman-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapman-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapman-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmanda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmiz-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmiz-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmizdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapmizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsan-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsan-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsiz-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsiz-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsanlarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapsizlarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapti [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapti-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapti-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapti-yu [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayapti-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayaptilarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 a/Y [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 may/Y [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ar/Z [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mas/Z [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 arki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 arda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardimki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardim-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardim-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardimda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardikki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardik-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardik-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardikda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 arding-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 arding-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingiz-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingiz-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardinglarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardinglar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardinglar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardinglarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardingizlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardi-yu [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardi-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardilarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardilar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardilar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ardilarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mas [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maski [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mas-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mas-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mas-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mas-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdimki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdim-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdim-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdim-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdim-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdimmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdimda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdimmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdik [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdikki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdik-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdik-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdik-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdik-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdikmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdikda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdikmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masding [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masding-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masding-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masding-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masding-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingiz-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingiz-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdinglarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdingizlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdi-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdi-yu [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdi-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilarda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdilarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidimki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidikki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidingki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidingizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidinglarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidingizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armidilarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidimki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidik [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidikki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmiding [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidingki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidingizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidinglar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidinglarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidingizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidiki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmidilarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikanmanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikanmizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikansanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikansizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikansanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikansanlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikansizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 armikanlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikanman [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikanmanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikanmiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikanmizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masmikansan [^aeiou]
