uz_UZ.dic
achchiqlash/X
adash/X
agʻdar/X
ajrat/X
akslantir/X
alanglat/X
alishtir/X
aloqalantir/X
angillash/X
anqish/X
arazlash/X
arit/X
arziqtir/X
asirlan/X
astoydillan/X
avralat/X
axtar/X
ayir/X
ayqirish/X
ayt/X
badbinlash/X
bagʻishlan/X
bajart/X
baqir/X
barobarla/X
batraklashtir/X
befarosatlash/X
bekittiril/X
beloruschala/X
berkitil/X
betinchlan/X
bezal/X
bezillash/X
bidirla/X
bilchillat/X
billurlash/X
birgalashtir/X
bitkaril/X
bodirla/X
boʻgʻishtir/X
boʻktar/X
boʻnakla/X
boʻshal/X
boʻtqalan/X
boʻzart/X
bombardimonla/X
bordir/X
boshqalat/X
botin/X
bozilla/X
bujray/X
bulgʻalash/X
burchaklan/X
burka/X
butlan/X
buyurtir/X
chagʻirlash/X
chalintir/X
chambaraklan/X
chanqat/X
chaqchaytir/X
chaqtir/X
charxla/X
chayin/X
chayqat/X
chekil/X
chetlan/X
chigʻirlash/X
chimdila/X
chiqaraver/X
chiq/X
chirpan/X
chiyala/X
chizella/X
choʻchish/X
choʻktir/X
choʻnqayt/X
choʻtirlash/X
choklattir/X
chordevor/X
chugʻurla/X
chuqurlat/X
chuvat/X
dadillantiril/X
dambala/X
darangʻla/X
dastakla/X
daxlsizlantir/X
deklaratsiyalan/X
devonalash/X
dikkakla/X
dimla/X
diversifikatsiyala/X
doʻloblash/X
doʻppay/X
doimiylashtir/X
dovla/X
dukullat/X
durustla/X
egasizlantir/X
ekranlan/X
elektrifikatsiyala/X
emish/X
ensizlash/X
eritil/X
esh/X
ettiril/X
eʼtiborsizlantir/X
farahlan/X
formalinlan/X
galalash/X
gangish/X
garantiyala/X
generatsiyala/X
gʻalayonlan/X
gʻashlan/X
gʻijirla/X
gʻingʻillash/X
gʻirmay/X
gʻoʻdday/X
gʻozlan/X
gʻururlantir/X
gijbanglat/X
gizilla/X
gruppalashtir/X
gumrohlash/X
gurkura/X
guvguvla/X
hakkalat/X
hangilla/X
haromla/X
havola/X
hayiq/X
hidlan/X
himoyalan/X
hoʻllat/X
hor/X
huhula/X
hurpaytir/X
ichiril/X
ifloslash/X
ikkilantir/X
ildizlat/X
iliq/X
imillash/X
indekslat/X
ingichkala/X
inon/X
internetlash/X
irgan/X
irjayish/X
ishlatish/X
ishqala/X
isitmala/X
isroflan/X
itlan/X
ixchamla/X
iy/X
izohlash/X
jadallat/X
jamgʻar/X
jarilla/X
jazmlan/X
jildirash/X
jilpanglash/X
jimjitlan/X
jipsla/X
jiyirtir/X
joʻnatish/X
jonlantirish/X
judolash/X
juzla/X
kallakla/X
kamsitil/X
karjla/X
kattalashtiril/X
kechkir/X
kengaytiril/X
ketayoz/X
kiraver/X
kisirla/X
koʻchir/X
koʻngilla/X
koʻrinish/X
kollektivlashtir/X
koordinatsiyala/X
kuchan/X
kumushlantir/X
kuyik/X
laqablan/X
literla/X
loyihala/X
mahkamlan/X
maroqlan/X
mayish/X
metinlan/X
milliylashtir/X
miriq/X
moʻltay/X
motorlashtir/X
mujassamlashtir/X
muqaddaslashtir/X
muyassarlan/X
narxlan/X
nikella/X
nizomlashtir/X
normalla/X
nusxalan/X
ochiq/X
ogʻulan/X
oʻgʻitla/X
oʻltirgʻiz/X
oʻpkalash/X
oʻrat/X
oʻrnattir/X
oʻtirtir/X
oʻtroqlashtiril/X
oʻynattir/X
olaytirish/X
oltinlan/X
oqish/X
orsizlan/X
oshla/X
ovqatlantir/X
ozish/X
parchalat/X
pastlashtiril/X
peshlash/X
pirillat/X
pismiqlash/X
poʻngʻilla/X
poshnalat/X
pullan/X
qadrlash/X
qaltirat/X
qappaytir/X
qarsillat/X
qatnat/X
qayish/X
qazi/X
qimirlat/X
qirq/X
qitiqla/X
qiyqirat/X
qizitil/X
qoʻnoqlash/X
qoʻshoqla/X
qonat/X
qoqinish/X
qovjirat/X
qulflan/X
qurish/X
qutlan/X
quvrat/X
ragʻbatlan/X
ravshanlashtir/X
rizolash/X
saharla/X
sanch/X
sarflash/X
saylattir/X
sementla/X
sertifikatla/X
shakarlan/X
shanqilla/X
shartlashish/X
shigʻa/X
shimdiril/X
shirinlash/X
shoʻlpillat/X
shovulla/X
shuʼlalan/X
silkish/X
sing/X
sirgʻal/X
siygʻala/X
sizsirash/X
soʻkil/X
soʻrattir/X
sollan/X
soxtala/X
sugʻuril/X
surdir/X
surulan/X
suyattir/X
taajjublan/X
takmilla/X
tamaddunlash/X
taniyol/X
taqimla/X
tarashlattir/X
tartiblash/X
tashnala/X
taxminlat/X
taʼminla/X
tejash/X
tepalan/X
termachila/X
tigʻa/X
tilan/X
tinchi/X
tipirchila/X
tiriqlat/X
tirtay/X
tiydir/X
toʻdalattir/X
toʻlgʻanish/X
toʻnkar/X
toʻqit/X
toʻygʻazdir/X
tolqonla/X
topta/X
toshtir/X
tubanlash/X
tulla/X
turkiyla/X
tushunil/X
tuttir/X
uchin/X
uhla/X
umidsizlantir/X
uqalan/X
ushal/X
uvulla/X
uyla/X
uzoqlash/X
valaqla/X
vavaqla/X
vitaminlashtiril/X
xaltala/X
xavotirlan/X
xirgoyila/X
xoʻrlan/X
xoslashtir/X
xususiylashtiril/X
yalligʻlash/X
yanchtir/X
yarimlat/X
yashirish/X
yechinish/X
yelpi/X
yetinqira/X
yigʻlamsi/X
yirt/X
yoʻlboshla/X
yoʻrtoqlan/X
yonaver/X
yoqala/X
yoshart/X
yoydir/X
yugurtir/X
yumshar/X
yurgiz/X
yuzala/X
zapasla/X
zichlash/X
zoʻraytir/X
